District of Columbia statutes.
29-1109

Assertion and defense of claims.

(a)

An unincorporated nonprofit association shall have the capacity to sue and be sued in its own name.

(b)

A member or a manager may assert a claim the member or manager has against an unincorporated nonprofit association. An association may assert a claim it has against a member or a manager.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 9 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).

Editor's Notes